Hawaii, session 2025, HB461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State's policy of providing highly subsidized parking for state employees limits the employees' choices, does not reduce traffic congestion or greenhouse gas emissions, and contradicts state policies to encourage alternative modes of transportation. According to the department of accounting and general services, four thousand seventy-six subsidized parking stalls are made available to state employees on Oahu, not including stalls located at the university of Hawaii or the department of education buildings.  An additional two hundred forty-three are made available on Hawaii island, two hundred seventy-eight on Maui, and one hundred fifty-one on Kauai. The legislature further finds that for many years the State has offered the limited option to employees to pay for monthly parking privileges at the department of accounting and general services' controlled lot located at or near the employees' workplace through pre-tax payroll deductions.  In addition to the savings for purchasing parking on a pre-tax basis, the parking privileges are offered at a rate of approximately one-third of the public rate.  For example, employee parking rates in the Honolulu downtown area range from $20 to $60 per month before any pre-tax savings, which is a fraction of the cost to park in a nearby private lot. Comparatively, the cost of a monthly adult bus pass on Oahu is $80, and the State does not provide a comparable bus pass benefit to its employees nor offer to all employees the ability to purchase a bus pass on a pre-tax basis.  State employees who travel to work by bicycle, foot, wheelchair, other mobility aid, or private car sharing also do not receive any transportation benefit or support even though their commuting modes reduce the number of cars driven in the State and parked in state lots. The legislature also finds that other jurisdictions, such as Washington, D.C., have enacted equitable transportation benefits laws and policies.  Various options, such as offering an equivalent transportation benefit that employees could select to apply to the cost of their preferred mode of transportation, could be implemented to increase parity. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the director of human resources development, in consultation with the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission, Hawaii state energy office, and department of accounting and general services, to develop and implement a commuting choice benefit program for all state employees regardless of mode of transportation. SECTION 2. (a)  The director of human resources development, in consultation with the Hawaiʻi climate change mitigation and adaptation commission, Hawaii state energy office, and department of accounting and general services, shall develop and implement a comprehensive commuting choice benefit program for all state employees regardless of mode of transportation.  The program shall administer, promote, and conduct education and outreach of state employee transportation benefits and encourage the use of healthy, economical, and environmentally sustainable commuting and discourage the use of single-occupant vehicle commuting. (b) Each state department and agency shall establish a volunteer employee transportation coordinator at each physical worksite of the department or agency.  The department of human resources development, in collaboration with the Oahu metropolitan planning organization, shall work with the volunteer employee transportation coordinator to hold monthly meetings to assist with the distribution of educational and marketing materials and provide guidance on encouraging employees to participate in the commmuting choice benefit program. (c) The department of human resources development shall offer fully subsidized public transit and bikeshare passes as a benefit option to all state employees. The public transit and bikeshare passes shall be integrated into state employee badges and shall be in accordance with existing transit pass badging programs. (d) The department of human resources development, in coordination with the department of accounting and general services, shall develop a parking opt-out program to allow all state employees to opt-out of a parking stall to receive a financial incentive. (e) The director of human resources development shall submit a report on the progress made toward implementing the program to the legislature no later than forty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the development of a commuting choice benefit program and the establishment of full-time equivalent (     FTE) permanent positions within the department of human resources development and full-time equivalent (     FTE) permanent positions within the Oahu metropolitan planning organization to administer and promote the program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of human resources development for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.